New York, session 2025-2026, A7463.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (x) and (xi) of subdivision 3 of section 14-130 2 of the election law, paragraph (x) as amended and paragraph (xi) as 3 added by chapter 136 of the laws of 2019, are amended and a new para- 4 graph (xii) is added to read as follows: 5 (x) travel expenses including automobile purchases or leases, unless 6 used for campaign purposes or in connection with the execution of the 7 duties of public office or party position and usage of such vehicle 8 which is incidental to such purposes or the execution of such duties; 9 [and] 10 (xi) childcare expenses, other than expenses incurred in the campaign 11 or in the execution of the duties of public office or party position[.]; 12 and 13 (xii) payment of any settlement fees, fines or penalties assessed 14 against the candidate in connection with a criminal or civil action, 15 investigation, or prosecution involving allegations of sexual harass- 16 ment. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05574-01-5